Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2004
Compliance review documents; confidentiality; held by governmental agency; effect.

Section 8-2003 does not apply to any information required by statute or rule and regulation to be maintained by or provided to a governmental agency while the information is in the possession of the governmental agency to the extent applicable law expressly authorizes its disclosure.

Laws 1995, LB 626, § 4.